src/scripts/Kyrgyz/g2p.foma
# Copyright (C) 2016, 2018  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

read text russian-loanwords.txt
letter machine
define RussianStressedLoanwords
clear
define RussianStressedStems [RussianStressedLoanwords .o. [?+ (ь:0)]].l;

define RussianUnstress 
А -> а || _ ,, 
Е -> е || _ ,,
Ё -> ё || _ ,, 
И -> и || _ ,, 
О -> о || _ ,, 
У -> у || _ ,, 
Ы -> ы || _ ,, 
Э -> э || _ ,, 
Ю -> ю || _ ,, 
Я -> я || _ ; 

define RussianStemsStressRules [RussianStressedStems .o. RussianUnstress].i; 

define RussianTranscribePlainConsonant б:"b_r"|в:"v_r"|г:"g_r"|д:"d_r"|з:"z_r"|к:"k_r"|л:"l_r"|м:"m_r"|н:"n_r"|п:"p_r"|р:"r_r"|с:"s_r"|т:"t_r"|ф:"f_r"|х:"h_r"; 

define RussianTranscribePalatalizedConsonant б:"b_j_r"|в:"v_j_r"|г:"g_j_r"|д:"d_j_r"|з:"z_j_r"|к:"k_j_r"|л:"l_j_r"|м:"m_j_r"|н:"n_j_r"|п:"p_j_r"|р:"r_j_r"|с:"s_j_r"|т:"t_j_r"|ф:"f_j_r"|х:"h_j_r"; 

define RussianTranscribeInvariantConsonant ж:"zh_r"|й:"j_j_r"|ц:"c_r"|ч:"ch_j_r"|ш:"sh_r"|щ:"sch_j_r";

define RussianTranscribeVowel а:"a0_r"|А:"a1_r"|е:"e0_i_r"|Е:"e1_i_r"|ё:"of1_i_r"|Ё:"of1_i_r"|и:"i0_i_r"|И:"i1_i_r"|о:"a0_r"|О:"o1_r"|у:"u0_r"|У:"u1_r"|ы:"y0_r"|Ы:"y1_r"|э:"e0_r"|Э:"e1_r"|ю:"uf0_i_r"|Ю:"uf1_i_r"|я:"a0_i_r"|Я:"a1_i_r"; 

define RussianPalatalizingContext ь|е|Е|ё|Ё|и|И|ю|Ю|я|Я; 

define RussianBasicTranscriptionRules 
RussianTranscribePalatalizedConsonant -> || _ RussianPalatalizingContext ,, 
RussianTranscribePlainConsonant -> || _ \RussianPalatalizingContext | .#. ,, 
RussianTranscribeInvariantConsonant -> ,, 
[..] -> "j_j_r" || .#.|а|А|е|Е|ё|Ё|и|И|о|О|у|У|ы|Ы|э|Э|ю|Ю|я|Я|ь|ъ _ е|Е|ё|Ё|ю|Ю|я|Я ,, 
RussianTranscribeVowel -> ,, 
ь|ъ -> 0 ; 

define RussianFixTranscription 
"a0_i_r" -> "i0_i_r" || _ \.#. ,, 
["i1_i_r":"y1_r"|"i0_i_r":"y0_r"|"uf1_i_r":"u1_r"|"uf0_i_r":"u0_r"] -> || ["c_r"|"zh_r"|"sh_r"] _ ; 

define RussianStemsTranscription 
RussianStemsStressRules .o. 
RussianBasicTranscriptionRules .o. 
RussianFixTranscription ; 

define KyrgyzTranscribeConsonant б:b|в:v|г:g|д:d|ж:dzh|з:z|й:j|к:k|л:l|м:m|н:n|п:p|р:r|с:s|т:t|ф:f|х:h|ц:c|ч:ch|ш:sh|щ:sch|[ң|ӊ]:ng ; 

define KyrgyzTranscribeNonJVowel {аа}:aa0|а:a0|и:i0|{оо}:oo0|о:o0|{уу}:uu0|у:u0|ы:y0|{ээ}:ee0|э:e0|{үү}:uuf0|ү:uf0|[{өө}|{ѳѳ}|{ɵɵ}]:oof0|[ө|ѳ|ɵ]:of0 ; 

define KyrgyzTranscribeJVowel е:e0|ё:o0|ю:u0|я:a0 ; 

define KyrgyzJVowelContext .#.|а|е|ё|и|о|у|ы|э|ю|я|ө|ү|ь|ъ ; 

define KyrgyzTranscriptionRules 
RussianStemsTranscription @-> || .#. _ ,, 
KyrgyzTranscribeConsonant @-> ,, 
KyrgyzTranscribeNonJVowel @-> ,, 
0:j KyrgyzTranscribeJVowel @-> || KyrgyzJVowelContext _ ,, 
KyrgyzTranscribeJVowel @-> || \KyrgyzJVowelContext _ ,, 
ь|ъ @-> 0 ; 

define KyrgyzLetter а|б|в|г|д|е|ё|ж|з|и|й|к|л|м|н|о|п|р|с|т|у|ф|х|ц|ч|ш|щ|ь|ы|ъ|э|ю|я|ө|ѳ|ɵ|ү|ң|ӊ | a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z ; 

define KyrgyzWord KyrgyzLetter+ ; 

define KyrgyzConvertLatinLetters 
a @-> а ,, 
b @-> б ,, 
c @-> ц ,, 
d @-> д ,, 
{ch} @-> ч ,, 
e @-> э ,, 
f @-> ф ,, 
g @-> г ,, 
h @-> х ,, 
i @-> и ,, 
j @-> ж ,, 
k @-> к ,, 
l @-> л ,, 
m @-> м ,, 
n @-> н ,, 
o @-> о ,, 
p @-> п ,, 
q @-> к ,, 
r @-> р ,, 
s @-> с ,, 
{sh} @-> ш ,, 
{sch} @-> щ ,, 
t @-> т ,, 
u @-> у ,, 
v @-> в ,, 
w @-> в ,, 
x @-> {кс} ,, 
y @-> й || _ [a|e|i|o|u] ,, 
y @-> ы || _ \[a|e|i|o|u] ,, 
z @-> з ; 

define KyrgyzTranscription KyrgyzWord .o. KyrgyzConvertLatinLetters .o. KyrgyzTranscriptionRules ; 

regex KyrgyzTranscription ; 
